Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2237.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state treasurer; Apache Junction; Superstition trails The sum of $4,500,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer for distribution to the city of Apache Junction for development and construction of enhancements to Superstition trails and a visitor gateway.